Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Beneficiary” has the meaning given that term in ORS 408.010.
(b) “Compensation” means money, a financial benefit or an item of value.
(c) “Unreasonable fee” means a fee that a court determines to be unreasonable compen-
sation for a service or function described in subsection (2)(a)(A) of this section after  con-
sidering:
(A) The extent and type of the service or function;
(B) The complexity of the case that the service or function addresses;
(C) The skill and competence required to provide the service or function;
(D) The amount of time the person spent in performing the service or function;
(E) The results the person achieved in performing the service or  function, such as
whether the veteran or beneficiary recovered any veteran’s benefit;
(F) The level of administrative or other review that occurred in the case, and the point
at which the person began providing the service or function;
(G) Rates or fees that other persons charge for similar services or functions;
(H) Whether, and to what extent, the fee or the  amount of the fee was contingent upon
the results the person achieved; and
(I) Whether  the veteran or beneficiary discharged the person before the case concluded
and, if so, why.
(d) “Veteran” means an individual who falls within either of the following classes:
(A) A veteran as defined in  5 U.S.C. 2108, as in effect on the effective date of this 2025
Act; or
(B) A veteran as defined in ORS 407.087.
(e) “Veteran’s benefit” means a  program, service, commodity, function, status or other
benefit that is available solely to veterans, eligibility for which:
(A) The United States  Department of Veterans Affairs, the United States Department
of Defense or another  federal agency determines in accordance with applicable federal laws
and regulations; or
Enrolled Senate Bill 150 (SB 150-A) Page 1
(B) The Department of Veterans’ Affairs determines  under ORS chapters 406, 407 and
408.
(2)(a) A person may not:
(A) Receive compensation, except  in strict accordance with this section or applicable
federal law, for:
(i) Preparing, presenting or prosecuting  an application for a veteran’s benefit on behalf
of a veteran or beneficiary;
(ii) Advising, consulting  with, assisting or representing a veteran or beneficiary in ob-
taining or making an application for a veteran’s benefit or in  appealing a notice of initial
decision on a claim for a veteran’s benefit; or
(iii) Referring a veteran or  beneficiary to another person that performs a service or
function described in sub-subparagraph (i) or (ii) of this subparagraph.
(B) Guarantee, either directly or by  implication, to another person that a veteran or
beneficiary is certain to receive a specific veteran’s benefit or a  specific level, percentage or
amount of a veteran’s benefit; or
(C) Receive an excessive or unreasonable fee for a  service or function described in this
paragraph.
(b) The prohibitions described in paragraph (a) of this subsection apply  to applications
or claims for a veteran’s benefit that is available under ORS chapter 407 or 408 to the extent
that an applicant  or a claimant is eligible to receive a service or function described in para-
graph (a)(A)(i) or (ii) of  this subsection at no charge from the Department of Veterans’ Af-
fairs or from a person that performs the service or function under  a delegation of authority
from the department. A person may  not charge an excessive or unreasonable fee in return
for performing a service or function described in paragraph (a)(A)(i) or (ii) of this subsection
even if the person may receive compensation for performing  the service or function because
the service or function is not otherwise available to the applicant or claimant at no charge.
(3) A person that in return for  compensation performs a service or function described in
subsection (2)(a)(A) of this section shall specify the  terms and conditions of the transaction
in a written agreement signed by all parties to the agreement. The agreement  must adhere
to the criteria set forth in 38 C.F.R. 14.636(g).
(4) In order to encourage veterans to seek  free advice and assistance concerning a claim
for a veteran’s benefit, the Department of Veterans’ Affairs shall conduct outreach, provide
education and disseminate information that, at a minimum:
(a) Identifies tribal veterans’ service officers, as described in 38 C.F.R.  14.629, as in effect
on the effective date of this 2025 Act, and county veterans’ service officers;
(b) Locates the offices or facilities throughout this state in  which the tribal veterans’
service officers and county veterans’ service officers provide services; and
(c) Describes the  services the tribal veterans’ services officers and county veterans’
service officers provide.
(5) A violation of this section is an unlawful practice under ORS 646.608.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 646.608, as amended by section 6, chapter 410, Oregon Laws  2023, is amended
to read:
646.608. (1) A person  engages in an unlawful practice if in the course of the person’s business,
vocation or occupation the person does any of the following:
(a) Passes off real estate, goods or services as the real estate, goods or services of another.
(b) Causes likelihood of confusion or of misunderstanding as to the  source, sponsorship, ap-
proval, or certification of real estate, goods or services.
(c) Causes likelihood of confusion or of misunderstanding as to affiliation,  connection, or asso-
ciation with, or certification by, another.
(d) Uses deceptive representations or designations  of geographic origin in connection with real
estate, goods or services.
Enrolled Senate Bill 150 (SB 150-A) Page 2
(e) Represents that real estate, goods or services have  sponsorship, approval, characteristics,
ingredients, uses, benefits, quantities  or qualities that the real estate, goods or services do not have
or that a  person has a sponsorship, approval, status, qualification, affiliation, or connection that the
person does not have.
(f) Represents that  real estate or goods are original or new if the real estate or goods are de-
teriorated, altered, reconditioned, reclaimed, used or secondhand.
(g) Represents that real  estate, goods or services are of a particular standard, quality, or grade,
or that real estate or goods are of a particular style or  model, if the real estate, goods or services
are of another.
(h) Disparages the real  estate, goods, services, property or business of a customer or another
by false or misleading representations of fact.
(i) Advertises real estate, goods or services with intent not to provide the real estate, goods or
services as advertised,  or with intent not to supply reasonably expectable public demand, unless the
advertisement discloses a limitation of quantity.
(j) Makes false or misleading representations of fact concerning  the reasons for, existence of,
or amounts of price reductions.
(k) Makes false or misleading representations concerning credit availability or the nature of  the
transaction or obligation incurred.
(L) Makes false or misleading representations  relating to commissions or other compensation to
be paid in exchange for permitting real estate, goods  or services to be used for model or demon-
stration purposes or in exchange for submitting names of potential customers.
(m) Performs service on or dismantles any goods or real estate if the owner or  apparent owner
of the goods or real estate does not authorize the service or dismantling.
(n) Solicits potential customers by telephone or door to door as a  seller unless the person pro-
vides the information required under ORS 646.611.
(o) In a sale, rental or other disposition of real estate, goods  or services, gives or offers to give
a rebate or discount  or otherwise pays or offers to pay value to the customer in consideration of
the customer giving to the person the names of prospective purchasers, lessees,  or borrowers, or
otherwise aiding the person in making a sale, lease, or loan  to another person, if earning the rebate,
discount or other  value is contingent upon an event occurring after the time the customer enters
into the transaction.
(p) Makes any false or misleading statement about a prize, contest or promotion  used to publi-
cize a product, business or service.
(q) Promises to deliver real estate, goods  or services within a certain period of time with intent
not to deliver the real estate, goods or services as promised.
(r) Organizes or induces or attempts to induce membership in a pyramid club.
(s) Makes false or misleading representations of fact concerning the offering  price of, or the
person’s cost for real estate, goods or services.
(t) Concurrent with tender or delivery of any real estate, goods or services, fails to disclose any
known material defect or material nonconformity.
(u) Engages in any other unfair or deceptive conduct in trade or commerce.
(v) Violates any of the provisions relating to  auction sales, consignment sales, auctioneers,
consignees or auction marts under ORS 698.640,  whether in a commercial or noncommercial situ-
ation.
(w) Manufactures mercury fever thermometers.
(x) Sells or supplies mercury fever  thermometers unless the thermometer is required by federal
law, or is:
(A) Prescribed by a person licensed under ORS chapter 677; and
(B) Supplied with instructions on the careful handling  of the thermometer to avoid breakage and
on the proper cleanup of mercury should breakage occur.
(y) Sells a thermostat that contains mercury, unless the thermostat is labeled  in a manner to
inform the purchaser that mercury is present in the thermostat  and that the thermostat may not be
Enrolled Senate Bill 150 (SB 150-A) Page 3
disposed of until the mercury is removed, reused, recycled  or otherwise managed to ensure that the
mercury does not become part of the solid waste stream or wastewater. For purposes of  this para-
graph, “thermostat” means a device commonly used to sense and,  through electrical communication
with heating, cooling or ventilation equipment, control room temperature.
(z) Sells or offers for sale a motor vehicle manufactured after January 1, 2006, that contains
mercury light switches.
(aa) Violates the provisions of ORS 803.375, 803.385 or 815.410 to 815.430.
(bb) Violates ORS 646A.070 (1).
(cc) Violates any requirement of ORS 646A.030 to 646A.040.
(dd) Violates the provisions of ORS 128.801 to 128.898.
(ee) Violates ORS 646.883 or 646.885.
(ff) Violates ORS 646.569 or 646A.374.
(gg) Violates the provisions of ORS 646A.142.
(hh) Violates ORS 646A.360.
(ii) Violates ORS 646.553 or 646.557 or any rule adopted pursuant thereto.
(jj) Violates ORS 646.563.
(kk) Violates ORS 759.680 or any rule adopted pursuant thereto.
(LL) Violates the provisions of ORS 759.705, 759.710 and 759.720 or any rule  adopted pursuant
thereto.
(mm) Violates ORS 646A.210 or 646A.214.
(nn) Violates any provision of ORS 646A.124 to 646A.134.
(oo) Violates ORS 646A.095.
(pp) Violates ORS 822.046.
(qq) Violates ORS 128.001.
(rr) Violates ORS 646A.800 (2) to (4).
(ss) Violates ORS 646A.090 (2) to (5).
(tt) Violates ORS 87.686.
(uu) Violates ORS 646A.803.
(vv) Violates ORS 646A.362.
(ww) Violates ORS 646A.052 or any rule adopted under ORS 646A.052 or 646A.054.
(xx) Violates ORS 180.440 (1) or 180.486 (1).
(yy) Commits the offense of acting as a vehicle dealer without a certificate under ORS 822.005.
(zz) Violates ORS 87.007 (2) or (3).
(aaa) Violates ORS 92.405 (1), (2) or (3).
(bbb) Engages in an unlawful practice under ORS 646.648.
(ccc) Violates ORS 646A.365.
(ddd) Violates ORS 98.853, 98.854, 98.856 or 98.858.
(eee) Sells a gift card in violation of ORS 646A.276.
(fff) Violates ORS 646A.102, 646A.106 or 646A.108.
(ggg) Violates ORS 646A.430 to 646A.450.
(hhh) Violates a provision of ORS 744.318 to 744.384.
(iii) Violates a provision of ORS 646A.702 to 646A.720.
(jjj) Violates ORS 646A.530 30 or more days after a recall notice, warning  or declaration de-
scribed in ORS 646A.530 is issued for the children’s product, as defined in ORS 646A.525, that is  the
subject of the violation.
(kkk) Violates a provision of ORS 697.612, 697.642, 697.652, 697.662, 697.682, 697.692 or 697.707.
(LLL) Violates the consumer protection provisions of the Servicemembers Civil  Relief Act, 50
U.S.C. 3901 et seq., as in effect on January 1, 2010.
(mmm) Violates a provision of ORS 646A.480 to 646A.495.
(nnn) Violates ORS 646A.082.
(ooo) Violates ORS 646.647.
(ppp) Violates ORS 646A.115.
Enrolled Senate Bill 150 (SB 150-A) Page 4
(qqq) Violates a provision of ORS 646A.405.
(rrr) Violates ORS 646A.092.
(sss) Violates a provision of ORS 646.644.
(ttt) Violates a provision of ORS 646A.295.
(uuu) Engages in the business of, or acts  in the capacity of, an immigration consultant, as de-
fined in  ORS 9.280, in this state and for compensation, unless federal law authorizes the person to
do so or unless the person is an active member of the Oregon State Bar.
(vvv) Violates ORS 702.012, 702.029 or 702.054.
(www) Violates ORS 646A.806.
(xxx) Violates ORS 646A.810 (2).
(yyy) Violates ORS 443.376.
(zzz) Violates a provision of ORS 646A.770 to 646A.787.
(aaaa) Violates ORS 815.077.
(bbbb) Violates section 1 of this 2025 Act.
(2) A representation under subsection (1) of this section  or ORS 646.607 may be any manifesta-
tion of any assertion by words or conduct, including, but not limited to, a failure  to disclose a fact.
(3) In order to prevail in an action or suit under ORS 336.184 and 646.605  to 646.652, a prose-
cuting attorney need not prove competition between the parties or actual  confusion or misunder-
standing.
(4) An action or suit may not be brought under subsection (1)(u) of this section  unless the At-
torney  General  has first established a rule in accordance with the provisions of ORS chapter 183
declaring the conduct to be unfair or deceptive in trade or commerce.
(5) Notwithstanding any other provision of ORS 336.184 and 646.605 to 646.652, if an action  or
suit is brought under subsection (1)(xx) of this section by a person other than a prosecuting attor-
ney, relief is limited to an injunction, and  the prevailing party may be awarded reasonable attorney
fees.
SECTION 3.
This 2025 Act  takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Passed by Senate April 1, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 3, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 150 (SB 150-A) Page 5